src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_PǞGIŅŽ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231
+N:	NMN_PǞGIŅŽ-PL      ;

LEXICON N_VAGĀŖ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vagāŗ:vagār 232
+N:	NMN_VAGĀŖ  ;
LEXICON N_VAGĀŖ-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vagāŗ:vagār 232
+N:	NMN_VAGĀŖ-SG  ;
LEXICON N_VAGĀŖ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vagāŗ:vagār 232
+N:	NMN_VAGĀŖ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TIDĀR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tidār:tidār 233
+N: 	NMN_TIDĀR  ;
LEXICON N_TIDĀR-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tidār:tidār 233
+N:     NMN_TIDĀR-PL   ;

LEXICON N_PĒGAL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pēgal:pēgal 234
	N_TIDĀR	;
LEXICON N_PĒGAL-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pēgal:pēgal 234
        N_TIDĀR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_APPÕN !!≈ * __@CODE@__ appõn:appõn 235
        N_APPÕN-SG ;
        N_APPÕN-PL ;
LEXICON N_APPÕN-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ appõn:appõn 235
+N:	NMN_APPÕN-SG ;
LEXICON N_APPÕN-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ appõn:appõn 235
+N:        NMN_APPÕN-PL  ;

LEXICON N_ǬʼRÕN !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
        N_TIDĀR ;
LEXICON N_ǬʼRÕN-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
        N_TIDĀR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kīndõr:kīndõr 237
        N_KĪNDÕR-SG  ;
        N_KĪNDÕR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kīndõr:kīndõr 237
+N:        NMN_KĪNDÕR-SG  ;
LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kīndõr:kīndõr 237
+N:        NMN_KĪNDÕR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR !!≈ * __@CODE@__ bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
	N_BÄʼZMÕR-SG  ;
	N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  ;
LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR-SG !!≈ * __@CODE@__ bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
+N:	NMN_BÄʼZMÕR-SG  ;
LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
+N:	NMN_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  ;

LEXICON N_TARĪĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tarīļ:tarīļ 239
+N:	NMN_TARĪĻ  ;
LEXICON N_TARĪĻ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tarīļ:tarīļ 239
+N:	NMN_TARĪĻ-PL  ;

LEXICON N_ĀNKAŖ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
	N_TARĪĻ	;
LEXICON N_ĀNKAŖ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
	N_TARĪĻ-PL ;

LEXICON N_VIRPÕĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ virpõļ:virpõļ 241
        N_TARĪĻ ;
LEXICON N_VIRPÕĻ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ virpõļ:virpõļ 241
        N_TARĪĻ-PL ;

LEXICON N_ǬʼBIĻ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
        N_TARĪĻ ;
LEXICON N_ǬʼBIĻ-PL !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
	N_TARĪĻ-PL ;

LEXICON N_GOLĀTÕKS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ golātõks:golātõks 244 found in Liv-est-lat dictionary
 N_KĒRATÕKS ; !!




!! !!Nominal inflection
!! !! Inflection lexica
LEXICON NMN_PŪ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pū:pū 12
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-puu__
!! Stem change: None
	NMN_PŪ-SG	;
	NMN_PŪ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_PŪ-SG
 	SG-DAT_n ;
 	SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
 	SG-GEN ;
 	SG-ILL_ʼzõ ;
! SG-INE ;
  	SG-INS_kõks ;
     	SG-NOM  ;
 	SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_PŪ-PL
 PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
 PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
 PL-ILL_ʼži ;
! PL-INE ;
 PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_RǬʼ
!! 13
!! * Yaml: __N-rooq__
!! Stem	change:	None
	NMN_RǬʼ-SG ;
	NMN_RǬʼ-PL ;

LEXICON  NMN_RǬʼ-SG
        SG-DAT_n ;
        SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
        SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_zõ ;
! SG-INE ;
        SG-INS_kõks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
        SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_RǬʼ-PL
	PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
	PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
	PL-ILL_ži ;
! 	PL-INE ;
 	PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_PǞ
!! 14
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-paeae__
!! Stem	change:	Yes 
!!  Vowel raising ǟ:ē +Pl +Ela/+Ill/+Par
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_PǞ-SG	;
	NMN_PǞ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_PǞ-SG
        SG-DAT_n ;
        SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
        SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_ʼzõ ;
        SG-INS_kõks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
        SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_PǞ-PL
        PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ILL_ʼži ;
!       PL-INE ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_TĪE !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tīe:tīʼe
!! 15
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-paeae__
!! Stem change: Yes
!!  Vowel lowering īe:ē +Pl +Ela/+Ill/+Par
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_TĪE-SG	;
	NMN_TĪE-PL	;
LEXICON NMN_TĪE-SG
:%^StodRM        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRM        SG-ELA/INE_stõ ;
:%^StodRM        SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_zõ ; !!≈ * __@CODE@__ 2014.12.12 Stød loss problem,
!! 		    	should be tīʼezõ
:%^StodRM        SG-INS_kõks ;
:%^StodRM        SG-NOM  ;
:%^StodRM        SG-PAR_dõ ;

LEXICON NMN_TĪE-PL
:%^StodRM        PL-INS_DKÕKS-STEM ;
:%^LowerVows%^StodRM%^VowsRM        PL-ELA/INE_šti ; !! tēšti
:%^LowerVows%^StodRM%^VowsRM        PL-ILL_ʼži ;
:%^LowerVows%^StodRM%^VowsRM        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_BRĪ
!! 16
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-mai__
!! Stem change: None
	NMN_BRĪ-PL	;
        SG-DAT_õn ;
        SG-ELA/INE_õst ;
	SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_õ ;
        SG-INS_õks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
	SG-PAR_õ ;

LEXICON NMN_BRĪ-PL
        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
        PL-ILL_ži ;
	PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_TEI  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tei:tei
!! 17
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-tei__ Pass 2014.12.12
!! Stem change: Yes 
!!  Vowel change: ei:ē
	NMN_TEI-SG	;
	NMN_TEI-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_TEI-SG
        SG-DAT_õn ;
        SG-ELA/INE_õst ;
	SG-GEN ;
        SG-ILL_õ ;
        SG-INS_õks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
	SG-PAR_õ ;

LEXICON NMN_TEI-PL
        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^VowsLI1        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^VowsLI1        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^VowsLI1	PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_KUŖĒ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kuŗē:kuʼŗ
!! 18
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-kurree??__
!! kuŗē:kuʼŗ
	NMN_KUŖĒ-SG	;
	NMN_KUŖĒ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_KUŖĒ-SG
:%^StodRMē        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMē        SG-GEN ;
:%^Stress2to1    SG-ILL_ZERO ;
! SG-INE ;
:%^StodRM        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRM        SG-NOM  ;
:%^Stress2to1    SG-PAR_ZERO ;

LEXICON NMN_KUŖĒ-PL
:%^StodRM        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^VowsRM        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^VowsRM        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^VowsRM        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

!! 18
LEXICON NMN_KALĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kalā:kaʼl
!!≈ * Yaml: __N-kalaa__ Pass: 2014.12.12
!! Stem change: Yes
!!   Consonant lengthening
!!   Consonant palatalization
!!   Vowel change in 2nd syllable ā:õ/0
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_KALĀ-SG	;
	NMN_KALĀ-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_KALĀ-SG
:%^StodRMā        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-GEN ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-ILL_ZERO ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-NOM  ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-PAR_ZERO ;

LEXICON NMN_KALĀ-PL
:%^StodRMā        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

!! 19
LEXICON NMN_TUBĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ tubā:tuʼb
!! * Yaml: __A-amaa, N-tubaa__ Pass: 2014.12.12
!! Stem change:	 Yes
!!   Vowel change in word-final position a:õ/0
!! Stød
 NMN_TUBĀ-SG ;
 NMN_TUBĀ-PL ;
LEXICON NMN_TUBĀ-SG
:%^StodRMā        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-GEN ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-ILL_ZERO ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-NOM  ;
:%{XC%}%>õ    SG-PAR_ZERO ;

LEXICON NMN_TUBĀ-PL
:%^StodRMā        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-ILL_ži ;
:%^PalatalizeLeft        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

!! 20
LEXICON NMN_AIGĀ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ aigā:aʼig
!! * Yaml: __N-aigaa__ 
!! Stem change: Yes
!!   vowel in 2nd syllable ā:õ/0
!! Stød: Yes
	NMN_AIGĀ-SG	;
	NMN_AIGĀ-PL	;
LEXICON NMN_AIGĀ-SG
:%^StodRMā        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-GEN ;
    SG-ILL_õ ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^StodRMā        SG-NOM  ;
    SG-PAR_õ ;

LEXICON NMN_AIGĀ-PL
:%^StodRMā        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:        PL-ILL_ži ;
:        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

LEXICON NMN_LĒBA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ lēba:leib
!! 21
!! * Yaml: __N-leeba__ Passed: 2014.12.12
!! Stem change: Yes
!!   vowel change ei:e
!! Stød: None
	NMN_LĒBA-SG	;
	NMN_LĒBA-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_LĒBA-SG
:%^VowsLI1a        SG-DAT_n ;
:%^VowsLI1a        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
:%^VowsLI1a        SG-GEN ;
:    SG-ILL_õ ;
:%^VowsLI1a        SG-INS_ks ;
:%^VowsLI1a        SG-NOM  ;
:    SG-PAR_õ ;

LEXICON NMN_LĒBA-PL
:%^VowsLI1a        PL-INS_DÕKS-STEM ;
:        PL-ELA/INE_šti ;
:        PL-ILL_ži ;
:        PL-PAR_ḑi ;

!! 21
LEXICON NMN_KŪJA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kūja:leiba
!!= * Yaml: 
!! No information
	NMN_KŪJA-SG	;
	NMN_KŪJA-PL	;

LEXICON NMN_KŪJA-SG
        SG-DAT_n ;
        SG-ELA/INE_st ;
        SG-GEN ;
:%^VowsShI1%^VowsRM    SG-ILL_õ ;
        SG-INS_ks ;
        SG-NOM  ;
:%^VowsShI1%^VowsRM    SG-PAR_õ ;
