src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
agānd:agān N_TIDĀR-PL  "akanat" ;
binzõl:binzõl N_APPÕN  "sisäpohja" ;
boʼggõr:boʼggõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "ruoppaaja" ;
bōgõn:bōgõn N_APPÕN  "viulun jousi" ;
būndal:būndal N_PĒGAL  "voiastia" ;
deserttarīļ:desert#tarīļ N_TARĪĻ  "jälkiruokalautanen" ;
diamētõr:dia#mētõr N_KĪNDÕR  "halkaisija" ;
diʼnniņd:diʼnniņ N_ǬʼBIĻ-PL  "ohimo" ;
eksõld:eksõl N_APPÕN-PL  "silppu" ;
elektõrgitār:elektõr#gitār N_TIDĀR  "sähkökitara" ;
elektõrēviļ:elektõr#ēviļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "sähköhöylä" ;
eʼlvātõr:eʼlvātõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "elevaattori" ;
golātõks:golātõks N_GOLĀTÕKS  "lirinä" ;
gräpīļd:gräpīļ N_TARĪĻ-PL  "räkä" ;
hlōrappõn:hlōr#appõn N_APPÕN  "kloorihappo" ;
joʼugbūmbal:joʼug#būmbal N_PĒGAL  "ulpukka" ;
juʼddõr:juʼddõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "ulkonpalko" ;
kalendār:kalendār N_TIDĀR  "kalenteri" ;
katōļ:katōļ N_TARĪĻ  "katolilainen" ;
kašīdsīezõr:kašīd#sīezõr N_KĪNDÕR  "kissankirppu" ;
kaʼddõn:kaʼddõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "vainaja" ;
kieʼddõr:kieʼddõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "värttinä" ;
kilāvagāŗ:kilā#vagār N_VAGĀŖ  "kylän pehtoori" ;
klapārd:klapār N_TIDĀR-PL  "YY" ;
knoušõļ:knoušõļ N_VIRPÕĻ  "hyttynen" ;
knõʼbbiļ:knõʼbbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "selkänoja" ;
kogīļ:kogīļ N_TARĪĻ  "kallo" ;
koppiļ:koppiļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "turskaonki" ;
krõmšõl:krõmšõl N_APPÕN  "rystynen" ;
krūopõļ:krūopõļ N_VIRPÕĻ  "vammainen" ;
krǟpiļd:krǟpiļ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "räkä" ;
kuŗētsepīļ:kuŗē#tsepīļ N_TARĪĻ  "YY" ;
kvadrātmettõr:kvadrāt#mettõr N_KĪNDÕR  "neliömetri" ;
kāngarsǭmal:kāngar#sǭmal N_PĒGAL  "maksasammal" ;
kīņḑõlluktār:kīņḑõl#luktār N_TIDĀR  "kynttelikkö" ;
kūldakǭzgõnd:kūlda#kǭzgõn N_APPÕN-PL  "kultahäät" ;
kūolõndǭʼrõnd:kūolõnd#ǭʼrõn N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  "ruumisvaatteet" ;
kūortiļ:kūortiļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "asunto" ;
kǭzgõnd:kǭzgõn N_APPÕN-PL  "häät" ;
lamātõkspaʼggõl:lamātõks#paʼggõl N_ǬʼRÕN  "ansa" ;
lūozber:lūozber N_KĪNDÕR  "laakeri" ;
mieʼdnädīļd:mieʼd#nädīļ N_TARĪĻ-PL  "kuherruskuukausi" ;
minerālappõn:minerāl#appõn N_APPÕN  "mineraalihappo" ;
mužīņ:mužīņ N_TARĪĻ  "pusu" ;
mäʼgnugār:mäʼg#nugār N_TIDĀR  "harjanne" ;
mõtsāsǭmal:mõtsā#sǭmal N_PĒGAL  "metsäsammal" ;
mīʼedǭʼrõnd:mīʼed#ǭʼrõnd N_BÄʼZMÕR  "miesten vaatteet" ;
nanāǭʼrõn:nanā#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "nenäliina" ;
nǭskiļ:nǭskiļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "naskali" ;
pakkõld:pakkõl N_APPÕN-PL  "tappurat" ;
paḑāǭʼrõn:paḑā#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "tyynyliina" ;
peppiņd:peppiņ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "kuumasavustettu kala" ;
peʼrnaiztidār:peʼr#naiz#tidār N_TIDĀR  "YY" ;
pieʼzǭʼrõnd:pieʼz#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN-PL  "pyykki" ;
pippõr:pippõr N_KĪNDÕR  "pippuri" ;
postõn:postõn N_APPÕN  "vartiopaikka" ;
pēgal:pēgal N_PĒGAL  "peukalo" ;
pīšõld:pīšõl N_APPÕN-PL  "pöly" ;
pūmpiļ:pūmpiļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "rakkula" ;
pūʼtiļ:pūʼtiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "talkkuna" ;
pǟʼrkiņ:pǟʼrkiņ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "peltoukonnauris" ;
rattiņd:rattiņ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "rukki" ;
raʼgdõsumāŗ:raʼgdõ#sumāŗ N_TARĪĻ  "rae" ;
relliņd:relliņ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "reelinki" ;
rištnaʼggõl:rišt#naʼggõl N_ǬʼRÕN  "mausteneilikka" ;
roʼvǭʼrõnd:roʼv#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN-PL  "kansallispuku" ;
rāndaǭʼbiļ:rānda#ǭʼbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "masmalo" ;
rēʼdõr:rēʼdõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "laivanvarustaja" ;
siktār:siktār N_TIDĀR  "sihteeri" ;
siʼžgõnd:siʼžgõn N_ǬʼRÕN-PL  "sisäelimet" ;
sportmēstar:sport#mēstar N_PĒGAL  "mestariurheilija" ;
sõʼvteātõr:sõʼv#teātõr N_KĪNDÕR  "kesäteatteri" ;
sīekõld:sīekõl N_APPÕN-PL  "sylki" ;
sūrēviļ:sūr#ēviļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "härkähöylä" ;
sūǭʼrõn:sū#ǭʼrõn N_ǬʼRÕN  "servietti" ;
sǭtõn:sǭtõn N_APPÕN  "saatana" ;
tabārd:tabār N_TIDĀR-PL  "kalan pyrstö" ;
tarīļ:tarīļ N_TARĪĻ  "lautanen" ;
tidārtidār:tidār#tidār N_TIDĀR  "tyttärentytär" ;
timotejǭʼbiļ:timotej#ǭʼbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "timotein tähkä" ;
tseremōnijmēstar:tseremōnij#mēstar N_PĒGAL  "seremoniamestari" ;
vagāŗ:vagār N_VAGĀŖ  "pehtori" ;
vaʼbbiļ:vaʼbbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "ovenkahva" ;
vaʼdmõl:vaʼdmõl N_ǬʼRÕN  "sarka" ;
virpõļ:virpõļ N_VIRPÕĻ  "arpakuutio" ;
vērzõld:vērzõl N_APPÕN-PL  "YY" ;
vīndal:vīndal N_PĒGAL  "vintilä" ;
vīviļd:vīviļ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "ähky" ;
vǭʼdõr:vǭʼdõr N_BÄʼZMÕR  "vaahtera" ;
vǭʼkīņḑõl:vǭʼ#kīņḑõl N_APPÕN  "vahakynttilä" ;
zubār:zubār N_TIDĀR  "tuulenpesä" ;
zǭkõr:zǭkõr N_KĪNDÕR  "naara" ;
āibald:āibal N_PĒGAL-PL  "sylki" ;
ērgiļd:ērgiļ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "urut" ;
ērgiļd:ērgiļ N_ĀNKAŖ-PL  "revontulet" ;
ēviļ:ēviļ N_ĀNKAŖ  "höylä" ;
ǭʼbiļ:ǭʼbiļ N_ǬʼBIĻ  "masmalo" ;
ǭʼrõnd:ǭʼrõn N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL  "vaatteet" ;
